Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.030

Establishing insanity as a defense.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) Evidence of insanity is not admissible unless the defendant, at the time of arraignment or within ten days thereafter or at such later time as the court may for good cause permit, files a written notice of his or her intent to rely on such a defense.

(2) Insanity is a defense which the defendant must establish by a preponderance of the evidence.

(3) No condition of mind proximately induced by the voluntary act of a person charged with a crime shall constitute insanity.

[ 1998 c 297 s 32; 1974 ex.s. c 198 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—Intent—1998 c 297: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.